lexc/inoun.lexc
LEXICON iChainVHub
@P.INFINITIVE.ON@مصدر=:@P.INFINITIVE.ON@0 ChainVB;
@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@صمفعولی=:@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@0 ChainVB;
@P.INFINITIVE.ON@منفی+مصدر=:@P.INFINITIVE.ON@ن¤ ChainVB;
@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@منفی+صمفعولی=:@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@ن¤ ChainVB;
@P.INFINITIVE.ON@@R.BAZ@منفی+مصدر=ذاشت:@P.INFINITIVE.ON@@R.BAZ@ن*ذاشت verbalStruct; !! منفی ماضی نقلی - نذاشته
@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@@R.BAZ@منفی+صمفعولی=ذاشت:@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@@R.BAZ@ن*ذاشت verbalStruct; !! منفی ماضی نقلی - نذاشته



!=======================FORMAL Marking==========================
!============================HA==============================
LEXICON consnHaComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnHaComNN;
LEXICON vowelHaComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelHaComNN;
!============================AtInAn============================
LEXICON consnAtInAnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnAtInAnComNN;
!============================InAn=============================
LEXICON consnInAnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnInAnComNN;
!============================AtAn=============================
LEXICON consnAtAnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnAtAnComNN;
!============================AtUn==============YEH=============
LEXICON vowelAtUnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelAtUnComNN;
!============================At===============================
LEXICON consnAtComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnAtComNN;
LEXICON vowelAtComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelAtComNN;
!============================Jat===============================
LEXICON consnJatComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnJatComNN;
LEXICON vowelJatComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelJatComNN;
!============================In===============================
LEXICON consnInComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnInComNN;
!============================Un===============================
LEXICON consnUnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnUnComNN;
!============================An===============================
LEXICON consnAnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ consnAnComNN;
LEXICON vowelAnComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelAnComNN;
!============================Yan===============================
LEXICON vowelYanComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelYanComNN;
!============================Gan===============================
LEXICON vowelGanComNNFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ vowelGanComNN;
!==============================================================

!============================PL clitics=============================
!============================HA ============================
LEXICON consnHaComNN
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!!!!!!!!!ALL VOWELS
LEXICON vowelHaComNN
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================AtInAn ==========================
LEXICON consnAtInAnComNN
+جان:*ان NNpostpl;
+جین:*ین NNpostpl;
+جات:*ات NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================InAn ===========================
LEXICON consnInAnComNN
+جان:*ان NNpostpl;
+جین:*ین NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================AtAn ==========================
LEXICON consnAtAnComNN
+جان:*ان NNpostpl;
+جات:*ات NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================AtUn =============YEH===========
!!!!!!!!!!!just vowel yeh
LEXICON vowelAtUnComNN
@C.VOWEL@+جون:@C.VOWEL@*ون NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@+جات:@C.VOWEL@*ات NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================At ============================
LEXICON consnAtComNN
+جات:*ات NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!just vowel yeh
LEXICON vowelAtComNN
@C.VOWEL@+جات:@C.VOWEL@*ات NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================Jat ============================
LEXICON consnJatComNN
+ججات:*جات NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!just vowels yeh alef heh
LEXICON vowelJatComNN
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+ججات:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@*جات NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+ججات:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@*جات NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+ججات:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*جات NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================In=============================
LEXICON consnInComNN
+جین:*ین NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================Un=============================
LEXICON consnUnComNN
+جون:*ون NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================An=============================
LEXICON consnAnComNN
+جان:*ان NNpostpl;
@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!!!!!!!!!!!just vowels yeh vav
LEXICON vowelAnComNN
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@*ان NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ان NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!============================Yan=============================
!!!!!!!!!!!!just vowels alef vav
LEXICON vowelYanComNN
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ان NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ان NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها NNpostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;

LEXICON num
اول consnHaComNNFRM;
سوم consnHaComNNFRM;
اول+ترتیبی:اول*ی consnHaComNNFRM;
اول+ترتیبی:اول*ین consnHaComNNFRM;
سوم+ترتیبی:سوم*ین consnHaComNNFRM;
سه consnHaComNNFRM;
سه+تا:سه×تا consnHaComNNFRM;
